en: Sugar coated chocolate confectioneries
fr: Confiseries au chocolat dragéifiées
hr: Slastice od čokolade obložene šećerom
lt: Cukrumi dengti šokoladiniai saldainiai

en: Marshmallows coated with chocolate
fr: Guimauves enrobées de chocolat
hr: Marshmallows preliven čokoladom
lt: Zefyrai su šokolado glajumi
pl: Pianki w polewie czekoladowej

en: Almond butter cups
zh: 杏仁酱巧克力杯

en: Bonbons
ca: Bombons
da: Bolsjer, karameller
de: Pralinen, schokoladenbonbons
es: Bombones, Bombones de chocolate
fr: Bonbons de chocolat
hr: Bombone
hu: Bonbonok
it: Cioccolatino
ja: ボンボン・ショコラ
nl: Pralines, chocolades snoepjes
pt: Bombons
ru: Конфеты
zh: 精致糖果, 夹心糖, 巧克力糖

en: Liqueur bonbons
fr: Bonbons de chocolat à la liqueur

en: Liquor filled chocolate covered cherries
de: Likörkirschen mit Schokoladenüberzug
es: Bombones de chocolate rellenos de cereza y licor, Cerezas al licor recubiertas de chocolate
fr: Bonbons de chocolat fourrés cerise et liqueur
hr: Višnje punjene likerom prelivene čokoladom
it: Ciliegie ricoperte di cioccolato ripiene di liquore
lt: Vyšnios pripildytos alkoholiu ir padengtos šokoladu
nl: Kersen met een chocolaag en gevuld met likeur

en: Milk chocolate candies
bg: Бонбони с млечен шоколад
de: Milchpralinen, Süssigkeiten mit Milchschokolade
fi: Maitosuklaamakeiset
fr: Bonbons de chocolat au lait
hr: Bomboni od mliječne čokolade
lt: Pieniško šokolado saldainiai, Pieniški šokoladiniai saldainiai
nl: Melkchocoladebonbons

en: Assorted chocolate candies
de: Pralinenmischung, Verschiedene Pralinen, Pralinensortimente
fi: suklaamakeissekoitus
fr: Assortiments de bonbons de chocolat
hr: Razni čokoladni bomboni
it: Assortimento di cioccolatini
lt: Šokoladinių saldainių asorti
nl: Gemengde chocosnoepjes
ru: Ассорти шоколадных конфет

en: Gianduiotti, Gianduiotto
xx: Gianduiotti
fr: Gianduiotti
it: Gianduiotti

en: Cremini
xx: Cremini
fr: Cremini
it: Cremini

de: Dominosteine
xx: Dominosteine

de: Mozartkugeln
xx: Mozartkugeln

en: Chocolate truffles
de: Schokoladetrüffel
es: Trufas de chocolate
fi: suklaatryffelit
fr: Truffes en chocolat, truffe en chocolat, truffes de chocolat, truffe de chocolat, truffes chocolatées
hr: Čokoladni tartufi
it: Tartufi al cioccolato, tartufo al cioccolato
ja: トリュフチョコレート
lt: Šokoladiniai triufeliai
nl: Chocolade truffels
sv: Chokladtryffel

en: Chocolate confectioneries filled with praline, chocolate and nut confectioneries filled with praline
fr: Rochers au chocolat fourrés au praliné

en: Chocolate confectioneries filled with wafer
fr: Bonbons de chocolat fourrés aux gaufrettes, Bonbons au chocolat fourrés au biscuit, Bouchées au chocolat fourrées aux gaufrettes, Bouchées au chocolat fourrées au biscuit

en: Chocolate coated chickpeas, Chocolate covered chickpeas
de: Schokoladenüberzogene Kichererbsen
es: Garbanzos cubiertos de chocolate
fr: Pois chiches enrobés de chocolat
hr: Slanutak preliven čokoladom
it: Ceci ricoperti di cioccolato
lt: Šokoladu aptraukti cicerchiai
nl: Chocolade bedekte kikkererwten
pt: Grão-de-bico coberto de chocolate

en: Chocolate covered fruits, Chocolate coated fruits
de: Früchte mit Schokoladenüberzug
es: Frutas recubiertas de chocolate
fi: suklaalla päällystetyt hedelmät
fr: Fruits enrobés de chocolat, Fruits enrobés au chocolat
hr: Voće preliveno čokoladom
it: Frutta ricoperta di cioccolato
lt: Vaisiai padengti šokoladu
nl: Vruchten met een chocolaag
pt: Frutas cobertas com chocolate

en: Chocolate-covered dates
da: Dadler med chokoladeovertræk
fr: Dattes enrobées de chocolat, Dattes chocolat
nl: Chocodadels, Met chocolade bedekte dadels, Dadels (Chocolade bedekt)
sv: Dadlar med chokladöverdrag, Chokladdoppade dadlar

en: Chocolate covered pineapple
fr: Ananas enrobées de chocolat

en: Chocolate covered banana
fr: Bananes enrobées de chocolat